Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Unlawful Conduct Within Governmental Facilities

Cross references. —

As to disruption of government agency meetings, see §

16-4-406

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d Breach of the Peace and Disorderly Conduct §§ 7, 29; 53A Am. Jur. 2d Mobs and Riots §§ 6 to 40; 75 Am. Jur. 2d Trespass §§ 162 to 199.

67 C.J.S. Obstructing Justice or Governmental Administration §§ 9, 11; 77 C.J.S. Riot § 1 et seq.

§ 6-6-301.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

:

“Governing body” means any elected or appointed commission, board, agency, council, trustees or other body created or authorized by the laws of this state and vested with authority to perform specified governmental, educational, proprietary or regulatory functions;

“Facilities” means any lands, buildings or structures.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-718; W.S. 1977, §

9-16-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 6-6-302.
Obstructive or disruptive conduct within governmental facilities prohibited.

No person, acting either singly or in concert with others, shall go into or upon facilities owned by, or under the control of, a governing body and obstruct or disrupt, by force, violence or other conduct which is in fact obstructive or disruptive, the activities conducted therein or thereon or the uses made thereof under the authority of the governing body. Obstructive or disruptive activities include restricting lawful:

Freedom of movement on or within a facility;

And designated use of a facility;

Ingress or egress on or within a facility.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-719; W.S. 1977, §

9-16-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-6-303.
Refusing to desist or remove oneself from facilities.

No person within or upon the facilities of a governing body shall refuse to desist from a course of conduct or to remove himself from the facilities upon request by an authorized representative of the governing body, after having been notified that the conduct or the presence of the person is contrary to or in violation of established policies, rules or regulations of the governing body which are reasonably related to the furtherance of the lawful purposes of the governing body and incident to the maintenance or orderly and efficient use of its facilities for the purposes for which acquired or designated.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-720; W.S. 1977, §

9-16-103

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-6-304.
Freedom of speech, press or assembly not abridged.

Nothing in W.S.

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

prevents, denies or abridges the freedom of speech or of the press, or the right of the people peaceably to assemble to consult for the common good, to make known their opinions, and to petition for the redress of grievances.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-721; W.S. 1977, § 9-16-104; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to freedom of speech and press, see art. 1, § 20, Wyo. Const.

As to right to petition and peaceably assemble, see art. 1, § 21, Wyo. Const.

§ 6-6-305.
Penalties for violations of article.

Any person violating any provision of W.S.

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-722; W.S. 1977, § 9-16-105; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-6-306.
Identification may be required; ejectment from facilities when presence unlawful or prohibited.

Every governing body, acting through its officers and employees, may require identification of any person within or upon its facilities and eject any person from the facilities upon his refusal to leave peaceably upon request, when his presence in a facility is unlawful or otherwise prohibited by the governing body.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-723; W.S. 1977, § 9-16-106; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-6-307.
No restriction on powers of governing body.

Nothing within W.S.

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

is intended, nor shall operate, to limit or restrict each governing body from carrying out its purposes and objectives through the exercise of powers otherwise granted by law nor shall preclude a governing body from taking disciplinary action against those violating W.S.

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

who are subject to its disciplinary authority.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 136, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-724; W.S. 1977, § 9-16-107; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 2.